Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB822.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-257 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for all colorectal cancer examinations
and laboratory tests specified in the most recent version of a Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services national coverage determination or nationally recognized
clinical practice guidelines, including guidelines published by the American
Cancer Society and the National Comprehensive Cancer Network and
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force,[
guidelines] for individuals referenced in paragraph (b)1. of this subsection and the
most recent version of the United States Multi-Society Task Force on Colorectal
Cancer guidelines for individuals referenced in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection
for complete colorectal cancer screening of asymptomatic individuals as follows:
(a) Coverage or benefits shall:
1. Include coverage for all United States Food and Drug Administration-
approved bowel preparation prescribed in connection with a colorectal
cancer examination or laboratory test; and
2. Be provided for all colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory tests
administered at a frequency identified in the relevant guidelines; and
(b) The covered individual shall be:
1. Forty-five (45) years of age or older; or
2. Less than forty-five (45) years of age and at high risk for colorectal
cancer.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the coverage required
by this section shall not be subject to:
1. Prior authorization; or
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2059
2. A deductible, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing requirements for
services received from participating providers under the health benefit
plan.
(b) If the application of any requirement of paragraph (a)2. of this subsection
would be the sole cause of a health benefit plan's failure to qualify as a Health
Savings Account-qualified High Deductible Health Plan under 26 U.S.C. sec.
223, as amended, then the requirement shall not apply to that health benefit
plan until the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, is
satisfied.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit coverage required by KRS 304.17A-259
or any other law.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act applies to health benefit plans issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act's
application to KRS 205.522 is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply
with federal law, the cabinet or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request the necessary
federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act's application to KRS
205.522; and
(2) May only delay implementation of Section 1 of this Act's application to KRS
205.522 for which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the
federal authorization or approval is granted.
Section 4. Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Section 5. Whereas adequate coverage for colorectal cancer examinations and
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2059
laboratory tests is critical for the health of the citizens of the Commonwealth, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:23 PM Jacketed